Idaho, session 2026, H0933.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Commission on Aging $129,900 from the
General Fund to be expended for trustee and benefit payments for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.